Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 669. RESTRICTIONS ON CERTAIN ACTIONS INVOLVING EXECUTIVE HEAD OF STATE AGENCY

Sec. 669.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Executive head of a state agency" means the director, executive director, commissioner, administrator, chief clerk, or other individual who is appointed by the governing body of the state agency or by another state or local officer to act as the chief executive or administrative officer of the agency and who is not an appointed officer. The term includes the chancellor or highest-ranking executive officer of a university system and the president of a public senior college or university as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(2) "State agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 572.002.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1174, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 618.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(55), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 669.002. REASSIGNMENT OF EXECUTIVE HEAD OF STATE AGENCY. The executive head of a state agency may not be reassigned to another position in the agency or at another agency that is also controlled by the same governing body unless the governing body, in an open meeting, votes to approve the proposed reassignment.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1174, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 618.002 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(55), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 669.003. CONTRACTING WITH EXECUTIVE HEAD OF STATE AGENCY. A state agency may not enter into a contract with the executive head of the state agency, with a person who at any time during the four years before the date of the contract was the executive head of the state agency, or with a person who employs a current or former executive head of a state agency affected by this section, unless the governing body:

(1) votes, in an open meeting, to approve the contract; and

(2) notifies the Legislative Budget Board, not later than the fifth day before the date of the vote, of the terms of the proposed contract.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1174, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 618.003 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(55), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 669.004. ACTIONS INVOLVING EXECUTIVE HEAD ARE OPEN RECORDS. (a) The terms of the reassignment of an executive head of a state agency and the terms of a contract with a current or former executive head of a state agency are subject to disclosure under Chapter 552 and may not be considered to be excepted from required disclosure under that chapter.

(b) A record that pertains to the reassignment of an executive head of a state agency, the terms of a consulting service contract with a current or former executive head of a state agency, or an agreement under which a state agency has paid or will pay or extend any monetary or other consideration to an executive head of a state agency in connection with the settlement, compromise, or other resolution of any difference between the state agency or the governing body and a current or former executive head of the state agency may not be withheld from public disclosure. A person that attempts to withhold from public disclosure a record under this subsection commits an offense. An offense under this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1174, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 618.004 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(55), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.